Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 1 Supreme Court

8-1-1.
Composition — Effect of resignation or retirement on pending cases.

The supreme court shall consist of a chief justice and four (4) associate justices; provided, however, that whenever any justice of the supreme court shall cease to be a justice thereof by reason of resignation or retirement, the resigned or retired justice shall be eligible to exercise the function of a justice of the supreme court for the purpose of participating in rendering decisions in all causes argued to the court prior to the resignation or retirement of the justice. The provisions of this section shall be interpreted and construed liberally, for the purpose of accomplishing the purpose thereof.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 272, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 322, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 495, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-1-1

; P.L. 1973, ch. 14, § 1.

8-1-2.
Jurisdiction and powers of court.

The supreme court shall have general supervision of all courts of inferior jurisdiction to correct and prevent errors and abuses therein when no other remedy is expressly provided; it may issue writs of habeas corpus, of error, certiorari, mandamus, prohibition, quo warranto and all other extraordinary and prerogative writs and processes necessary for the furtherance of justice and the due administration of the law; it may entertain informations in the nature of quo warranto and petitions in equity to determine title to any office; it shall have jurisdiction of petitions for trials and new trials, as provided by law, of bills of exceptions, appeals and certifications to the supreme court, and special cases in which parties having adversary interests concur in stating questions for the opinion of the court as provided by law; and it shall by general or special rules regulate the admission of attorneys to practice in all the courts of the state.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 272, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 322, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 495, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-1-2

.

8-1-3.
Written opinions.

The supreme court shall render written opinions in all cases decided by it wherein points of law, pleading, or practice have arisen which are novel or of sufficient importance to warrant written opinions. A supreme court administrative assistant shall prepare and file with the clerk of the court the original paper copy and an electronic copy of each opinion or rescript; the clerk shall then distribute copies for the use of the reporter, and one for each of the parties involved in the cause in which the opinion or rescript is given not less than two (2) hours prior to the posting of the opinion on the supreme court website. Thereafter, the clerk shall post a copy of the opinion on the supreme court website.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 272, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 322, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 495, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

8-1-3

; P.L. 1977, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 273, § 1.

8-1-4.
Seal of court.

The supreme court shall have a seal, which shall contain the words “SUPREME COURT OF THE STATE OF RHODE ISLAND”, and such device as the court shall adopt.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 36; G.L. 1909, ch. 274, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 324, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 497, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

8-1-4

; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 1, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 1, effective June 23, 2021.

8-1-5.
Reporter — Appointment and tenure.

The supreme court shall appoint a reporter of the decisions and opinions of the court, who shall hold office during the pleasure of the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 63; G.L. 1909, ch. 277, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 327, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 502, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-1-5

.

8-1-6.
Duties of reporter.

The reporter shall make true reports of all cases in which written opinions have been rendered, and of all decisions and rescripts of the court which he or she may deem to be important and useful, and also all such matters as the court may order to be reported.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 64; G.L. 1909, ch. 277, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 327, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 502, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-1-6

.

8-1-7.
Printing of reports.

The reporter shall, as often as he or she has material for a printed volume of not less than six hundred (600) pages, notify the state purchasing agent, and the agent shall call for competitive bids for printing and binding the volume and shall award the contracts therefor to the lowest responsible bidder, who shall publish the material, with an index prepared by the reporter, in a bound volume to be known as the Rhode Island Reports.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 65; G.L. 1909, ch. 277, § 3; P.L. 1913, ch. 911, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2177, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 327, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 502, § 3; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-1-7

.

8-1-8.
Distribution of reports — Payment of cost.

Whenever the reporter shall cause to be published, as provided in §

8-1-7

, an edition of a volume of reports, he or she may retain for his or her own use twenty-five (25) copies. The remainder of the edition he or she shall deliver to the secretary of state, and shall assign to the secretary of state, for the use of the state, the copyright of the volume, if it shall have been copyrighted. Upon the delivery, and upon the assignment in case of a copyright, the state controller shall draw his or her order upon the general treasurer for the cost of the edition upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers authenticated by the reporter and approved by the state purchasing agent.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 68; G.L. 1909, ch. 277, § 6; redesignated § 4 by P.L. 1913, ch. 911, § 2; P.L. 1922, ch. 2177, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 327, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 502, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

8-1-8

.

8-1-9.
Judicial conference of Rhode Island.

There is hereby established a judicial conference to be known as the judicial conference of Rhode Island, consisting of all the justices of the supreme, superior, and district courts and the family court of the state and of such other members as the supreme court may from time to time determine, for the consideration of matters relating to judicial business, the improvement of the judicial system, and the administration of justice. The supreme court shall by rule provide for the organization and conduct of the conference. The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as shall be necessary to carry out the purposes of this section, and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her order on the general treasurer for the payment of such sum, or so much thereof, as may be required from time to time, upon receipt by him or her of duly authenticated vouchers approved by the presiding justice.

History of Section.

G.L., §

8-1-9

, as enacted by P.L. 1962, ch. 12, § 1.